Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 4. Discipline.

Sec. 08.26.130.
Grounds for disciplinary action.

The department may take disciplinary action against an individual under AS

08.01.075

or refuse to issue or renew a license if the department determines that the individual

obtained or attempted to obtain a license under this chapter through deceit, fraud, or intentional misrepresentation;

has not complied with the standards of conduct established by the department under AS

13.26.001

;

forfeited a license in this or another jurisdiction as a result of deceit, fraud, intentional misrepresentation, or professional incompetence;

has been found by a court in this state to have engaged in professional misconduct or incompetence;

has advertised the individual’s services in a false or misleading manner;

has been convicted, including a conviction based on a guilty plea or plea of nolo contendere, of a felony or other crime that affects the individual’s ability to provide services competently and safely for the ward or protected person;

has been found to have abandoned, exploited, abused, or neglected a vulnerable adult; in this paragraph, “vulnerable adult” has the meaning given in AS

47.24.900

;

has failed to comply with this chapter or with a regulation adopted under this chapter;

has continued or attempted to practice after becoming unfit due to professional incompetence;

has failed to maintain certification by a nationally recognized organization in the field of

guardianships, if the individual was issued a private professional guardian license; or

conservatorships, if the individual was issued a private professional conservator license; or

fails to maintain a bond or other surety as required by a court order.

History.

(§ 2 ch 84 SLA 2004; am § 10 ch 53 SLA 2008)

Sec. 08.26.140.
Petition by department.

In addition to the disciplinary actions allowed under AS

08.01.075

, the department may petition a court to review the conduct of a licensee if the department determines that the conduct of the licensee may not be in the best interests of the ward or protected person.

History.

(§ 2 ch 84 SLA 2004)